Hawaii statutes.
D. Reporting
and Filing with the Commission

Case Notes

The "noncandidate committee" definition and
accompanying reporting and disclosure requirements were substantially related
to Hawaii's important interests in informing the electorate, preventing corruption
or its appearance, and avoiding the circumvention of valid campaign finance
laws. Because the burden of complying with the disclosure scheme was modest
compared to the significance of the interests being served, the court upheld
the noncandidate committee reporting and disclosure requirements, as applied to
plaintiff, a for-profit corporation. 786 F.3d 1182 (2015).

§11-331 Filing of reports,
generally. (a) Every report required to be filed by a candidate or
candidate committee shall be certified as complete and accurate by the
candidate and treasurer.

(b) Every report required to be filed by a
noncandidate committee shall be certified as complete and accurate by the
chairperson and treasurer.

(c) All reports required to be filed under this
part shall be filed on the commission's electronic filing system.

(d) For purposes of this part, whenever a
report is required to be filed with the commission, "filed" means
that a report shall be filed with the commission's electronic filing system by
the date and time specified for the filing of the report by:

(1) The candidate or candidate committee of a
candidate who is seeking election to the:

(A) Office of governor;

(B) Office of lieutenant governor;

(C) Office of mayor;

(D) Office of prosecuting attorney;

(E) County council;

(F) Senate;

(G) House of representatives; or

(H) Office of Hawaiian affairs; or

(2) A noncandidate committee required to be
registered with the commission pursuant to section 11-323.

(e) To be timely filed, a committee's reports
shall be filed with the commission's electronic filing system on or before
11:59 p.m. Hawaiian standard time on the filing date specified.

(f) All reports filed under this part are
public records and shall be made available for public inspection on the
commission's website in a searchable database. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L
2011, c 5, §4; am L 2013, c 112, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next